Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Article 5. Disclosure Statements Required to be Filed.
§ 30-122.
Enforcement.

The provisions of this chapter shall be enforced by the Attorney General. In addition to any other powers and duties prescribed by law, the Attorney General shall have the following powers and duties:

If he determines that any legislator has knowingly violated any provision of this chapter, he shall designate an attorney for the Commonwealth who shall have complete and independent discretion in the prosecution of the legislator; and

He shall render advisory opinions to any legislator who seeks advice as to whether the facts in a particular case would constitute a violation of the provisions of this chapter. He shall determine which of his opinions or portions thereof are of general interest to the public and which may, from time to time, be published.Irrespective of whether an opinion of the Attorney General has been requested and rendered, any legislator has the right to seek a declaratory judgment or other judicial relief as provided by law.

History.

1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1, § 2.1-639.59; 2001, c. 844.

Cross references.

As to conduct prohibited by the General Assembly Conflicts of Interest Act, see § 30-103.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2001.

§ 30-123.
Knowing violation of chapter a misdemeanor.

Any legislator who knowingly violates any of the provisions of Articles 2 through 5 (§§ 30-102 through 30-111) of this chapter shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. A knowing violation under this section is one in which the person engages in conduct, performs an act or refuses to perform an act when he knows that the conduct is prohibited or required by this chapter. There shall be no prosecution for a violation of § 30-108 or subsection C of § 30-110 unless the house in which the member sits has referred the matter to the Attorney General as provided in subdivision 4 of § 30-116.

History.

1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1, § 2.1-639.54; 2001, c. 844.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2001.

§ 30-124.
Advisory opinions.

A legislator shall not be prosecuted or disciplined for a violation of this chapter if his alleged violation resulted from his good faith reliance on a written opinion of a committee on standards of conduct established pursuant to § 30-120, an opinion of the Attorney General as provided in § 30-122, or a formal opinion or written informal advice of the Council established pursuant to § 30-355, and the opinion or advice was made after his full disclosure of the facts regardless of whether such opinion or advice is later withdrawn provided the alleged violation occurred prior to the withdrawal of the opinion or advice.

History.

1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1, § 2.1-639.55; 2001, c. 844; 2014, cc. 792, 804; 2015, cc. 763, 777; 2017, cc. 829, 832.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2001.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 792 and 804 are identical, and inserted “or a formal opinion of the Virginia Conflict of Interest and Ethics Advisory Council established pursuant to § 30-355,” and made a related change.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by cc. 763 and 777, effective January 1, 2016,
are identical and inserted “regardless of whether such opinion is later withdrawn provided the alleged violation occurred prior to the withdrawal of the opinion.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 829 and 832 are identical, and substituted “formal opinion or written informal advice of the Council” for “formal opinion of the Virginia Conflict of Interest and Ethics Advisory Council” and substituted “opinion or advice” for “opinion” three times.

§ 30-125.
Invalidation of contract; recision of sales.

Any contract made in violation of § 30-103 or § 30-105 may be declared void and may be rescinded by the contracting or selling governmental authority within five years of the date of the contract. In cases in which the contract is invalidated, the contractor shall retain or receive only the reasonable value, with no increment for profit or commission, of the property or services furnished prior to the date of receiving notice that the contract has been voided. In cases of recision of a contract of sale, any refund or restitution shall be made to the contracting or selling governmental agency.

Any purchase made in violation of § 30-103 or § 30-105 may be rescinded by the contracting or selling governmental agency within five years of the date of the purchase.

History.

1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1, § 2.1-639.56; 2001, c. 844.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2001.

§ 30-126.
Civil penalty from violation of this chapter.

In addition to any other fine or penalty provided by law, any money or other thing of value derived by a legislator from a violation of §§ 30-103 through 30-108 shall be forfeited and, in the event of a knowing violation, there may also be imposed a civil penalty in an amount equal to the amount of money or thing of value forfeited to the Commonwealth. If the thing of value received by the legislator in violation of this chapter should enhance in value between the time of the violation and the time of discovery of the violation, the greater value shall determine the amount of the civil penalty.

A legislator who fails to file the disclosure form required by § 30-111 within the time period prescribed shall be assessed a civil penalty in an amount equal to $250. The Council shall notify the Attorney General of any legislator’s failure to file the required form within 30 days of the deadline for filing and the Attorney General shall assess and collect the civil penalty. All civil penalties collected pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited into the general fund and used exclusively to fund the Council.

History.

1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1, § 2.1-639.57; 2001, c. 844; 2012, cc. 283, 756; 2015, cc. 763, 777.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2001.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 283 and 756 are identical, and substituted “the amount of the civil penalty” for “the amount of forfeiture” at the end of the section.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by cc. 763 and 777, effective January 1, 2016, are identical and designated former section as subsection A and added subsection B.

§ 30-127.
Criminal prosecutions.

Violations of this chapter may be prosecuted notwithstanding the jurisdiction of, or any pending proceeding before, the House or Senate Ethics Advisory Panel.

Nothing in this chapter shall limit or affect the application of other criminal statutes and penalties as provided in the Code of Virginia, including but not limited to bribery, embezzlement, perjury, conspiracy, fraud, and violations of the Campaign Finance Disclosure Act Chapter 9.3 (§

24.2-945

et seq.) of Title 24.2.

History.

1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1, § 2.1-639.61; 2001, c. 844; 2006, cc. 787, 892.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2001.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 787 and 892 are identical, and substituted “Chapter 9.3 (§

24.2-945

et seq.) of Title 24.2” for “(§

24.2-900

et seq.).”

§ 30-128.
Limitation of actions.

The statute of limitations for the criminal prosecution of a legislator for violation of any provision of this chapter shall be one year from the time the Attorney General has actual knowledge of the violation or five years from the date of the violation, whichever event first occurs.

History.

1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1, § 2.1-639.58; 2001, c. 844.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2001.

§ 30-129.
Venue.

Any prosecution for a violation of this chapter shall be brought in the circuit court of the jurisdiction in which the legislator resides, or the jurisdiction in which he resided at the time of the alleged violation if he is no longer a resident of the Commonwealth.

History.

1987, Sp. Sess., c. 1, § 2.1-639.60; 2001, c. 844.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2001.